Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1220XS (5) 91 ss/ns S.F. 82 Section 1. Section 423F.4, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. Bonds issued on or after July 1, 2019, shall not be sold 3 at public sale as provided in chapter 75 , or at a private sale, 4 without notice and hearing. Notice of the time and place of 5 the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 6 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 7 which is a newspaper of general circulation in the school 8 district. 9 b. For bonds subject to the requirements of paragraph 10 âaâ for the amount of five million dollars or more , or if at 11 any time prior to the fifteenth day following the hearing , 12 held under paragraph âaâ the secretary of the board of 13 directors receives a petition containing the required number 14 of signatures and asking that the question of the issuance of 15 such bonds a bond for the amount of less than five million 16 dollars be submitted to the voters of the school district, 17 the board shall either rescind its adoption of the resolution 18 or direct the county commissioner of elections to submit the 19 question to the registered voters of the school district at an 20 election held on the date specified in section 39.2, subsection 21 4 , paragraph âdâ . The petition must be signed by eligible 22 electors equal in number to not less than one hundred or thirty 23 percent of the number of voters at the last preceding election 24 of school officials under section 277.1 , whichever is greater. 25 If the board submits the question at an election and a majority 26 sixty percent of those voting on the question favors issuance 27 of the bonds, the board shall be authorized to issue the bonds. 28